Missouri, session 2026, HB2803.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 209.030, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 209.030, to read as follows:
209.030. 1. Every adult blind person, eighteen years of age or over, of good moral
character who shall have been a resident of the state of Missouri for one year or more next
preceding the time of making application for the pension herein provided and every adult
blind person eighteen years of age or over who may have lost his or her sight while a bona
fide resident of this state and who has been a continuous resident thereof since such loss of
sight, shall be entitled to receive, when enrolled under the provisions of sections 209.010 to
209.160, an annual pension as provided for herein, payable in equal monthly installments,
provided, that no such person shall be entitled to or be paid a blind pension who:
(1) Owns property or has an interest in property to the value of thirty thousand dollars
or more, or if married and actually living with husband or wife, if the value of his or her
interest in property, together with that of such husband or wife, exceeds said amount;
provided that, the first one hundred thousand dollars in an individual's ABLE account under
sections 209.600 to 209.645 shall be excluded from such asset limit; provided, further, that in
determining the total value of property owned, the real estate occupied by the blind person or
spouse as the home, shall be excluded;
(2) Obtains, maintains, or renews a valid driver's license in this or any other state or
territory, unless such license has been relinquished to the department of revenue and the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2803 2
person provides satisfactory proof of such relinquishment to the department of social services.
The department of social services shall notify eligible blind persons with valid driver's
licenses that they shall surrender such licenses within sixty days of approval for a blind
pension. Upon receipt of a relinquished license under this subdivision, the department of
revenue shall, if requested by the person, issue a nondriver's license card compliant with the
provisions of chapter 302 at no charge to the person. The department of social services and
the department of revenue shall jointly establish procedures and shall share any information
necessary to implement this subdivision;
(3) Operates a motor vehicle with or without a valid driver's license;
(4) Has a sighted spouse resident in this state who upon the investigation of the
family support division may be found to be able to provide for the reasonable support of such
applicant if the sighted spouse's annual income is equal to or greater than five hundred percent
of the federal poverty level for each state fiscal year;
(5) Publicly solicits alms in any manner or through any artifice in any part of this
state;
(6) Is maintained in a private or endowed institution or is an inmate of a public
institution, except as a patient in a public medical institution[;], provided[,] that benefits shall
not be paid to a blind person under sixty-five years of age[,] who is a patient in an institution
for mental diseases or tuberculosis. In order to comply with federal laws and regulations and
state plans in making payments to or on behalf of mentally ill individuals sixty-five years of
age, or over, who are patients in a state mental institution, the family support division shall
require agreements or other arrangements with the institution to provide a framework for
cooperation and to assure that state plan requirements and federal laws and regulations
relating to such payment will be observed. In the event the federal laws or regulations will
not permit approval of the state plan for benefit payments to or on behalf of an individual who
is sixty-five years of age, or over, and is a patient in a state institution for mental diseases, this
portion of this subdivision shall be inoperative until approval of a state plan is obtained;
(7) Is otherwise not blind and not eligible for a blind pension under this chapter; or
(8) Pleads guilty or has been found to have violated section 209.140.
2. Any applicant for or any recipient of a blind pension who does not submit, without
good cause or as otherwise specified by the department of social services, to a vision test as
required under section 209.040 within thirty days of a request by the department shall not be
eligible for a blind pension and the department shall terminate payment after notice and an
opportunity for a hearing.
3. The applicant for or recipient of a blind pension shall inform the department of any
change of address or other contact information and any other change of circumstances that
may impact the applicant or recipient's eligibility for a blind pension within ten days of the

HB 2803 3
change. Any notice served on the applicant or recipient shall be sent by [certified] mail
delivered by the United States Postal Service at the applicant's or recipient's address of record
and shall be deemed service for all purposes under sections 209.010 to 209.160.
✔